Utah statutes.
41-1a-217.   Application for renewal of registration.
(1)  Renewal of a vehicle registration shall be made by the owner upon
application and by payment of the fees or taxes required under Subsection
41-1a-203(1).
(2)  The application for registration renewal and applicable fees or taxes
shall be accompanied by a:
(a)  safety inspection certificate as required under Section 41-1a-205; and
(b)  certificate of emissions inspection as required under Section 41-6a-1642.
(3)  The new registration card issued shall show:
(a)  the identical information with respect to the owner and the vehicle
description required by Section 41-1a-213; and
(b)  the new expiration date.
